Tennessee, session 114, SB2700.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Chapter 207 of the Private Acts of 1996, as amended and rewritten by
Chapter 158 of the Private Acts of 2002, Chapter 72 of the Private Acts of 2008, Chapter 31 of
the Private Acts of 2023, and any other acts amendatory thereto, is amended in SECTION 18
by deleting the language "one hundred twenty dollars ($120) per month" and substituting the
language "three hundred dollars ($300) per month".
SECTION 2. Chapter 207 of the Private Acts of 1996, as amended and rewritten by
Chapter 158 of the Private Acts of 2002, Chapter 13 of the Private Acts of 2013, and any other
acts amendatory thereto, is amended by deleting SECTION 21 and substituting:
SECTION 21. In accordance with State law, the Board of Mayor and Aldermen
shall designate the procedures for the disbursement of funds, which shall be made upon
approval of the board.
SECTION 3. Nothing in this act shall be construed to alter the salary of any incumbent
prior to the end of the term for which such elected official was selected.
SECTION 4. This act shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote
of the legislative body of the City of Greenbrier. Its approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed
by the presiding officer of the legislative body and certified to the secretary of state.
SECTION 5. For the purpose of approving or rejecting the provisions of this act, it shall
be effective upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, it shall
become effective as provided in Section 4.
SB2700
013049
- 1 -